Mississippi, session 2026, HB609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Tim Tebow Act." (2)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases have the meanings ascribed in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Homeschool" means a legitimate home instruction program as described under Section 37-13-91(3). (b) "Interscholastic extracurricular activity" means any school-authorized sport or activity sanctioned by the Mississippi High School Activities Association. (c)  "Appropriate documentation" means: (i)  The results of a nationally recognized standardized test or its equivalent as determined by the State Department of Education; (ii)  A portfolio of the student's school work from the previous year demonstrating the student's proficiency appropriate for the student's grade level, as determined in the discretion of the school principal or counselor; or (iii)  If the student was enrolled in a public, private, parochial or charter school during the preceding school year, records evidencing the student's eligibility based on the student's academic success at that school. (3)  (a)  A student enrolled in a homeschool is eligible to participate in interscholastic extracurricular activities sponsored or engaged in by the public school to which the student would be assigned according to the attendance policies adopted by the school board of the local school district.  A homeschool student who leaves a public school during the school year is subject to the transfer protocols that apply to transfers from one (1) public school to another public school.  A student who is eligible under this section and selected to participate in an extracurricular activity must: (i)  Adhere to the same standards of behavior, responsibility, performance and code of conduct as other participants in the extracurricular activity; (ii)  Adhere to the same academic standards as other participants, with those standards confirmed by appropriate documentation provided by the student to the public school providing the extracurricular activity in which the student participates. However, if the documentation provided gives the local school board reasonable suspicion that the documentation is false in its claims of satisfaction of academic standards and grade placement the student may be administered a grade-level placement examination.  Additionally, students allowed to participate in public school extracurricular activities must participate in the statewide testing program, but shall be a separate category for allocating levels of proficiency, which shall not impact the local district of participation's accountability rating; (iii)  Register with the school the student's intent to participate in the extracurricular activity as a representative of the school before the beginning date of the semester during which the extracurricular activity in which the student wishes to participate is offered; and (iv)  Comply with the same physical examination, immunization, insurance, age and semester eligibility requirements as other students participating in the extracurricular activity. (b)  Transportation of a student being educated in a homeschool to a public school to participate in interscholastic extracurricular activities is the responsibility of the parent, guardian or student.  The student may use the same transportation as other students so long as additional expenses are not incurred by the school district. (c)  In selecting the members of an interscholastic extracurricular team, a public school shall not discriminate against a student being educated in a homeschool who is eligible to participate under this section. (4)  Participation in an interscholastic extracurricular activity is a privilege and not a right. Nothing in this act shall be interpreted to create a cause of action on behalf of a student against a public school or public school district official or against an interscholastic extracurricular activities association. (5)  With respect to a homeschool student's education program, nothing in this section shall be construed to permit an agency of the state, a public school district or any other governmental body to exercise control, regulatory authority or supervision over a homeschool student or parent or person standing in parental relation to a homeschool student beyond the control, regulatory or supervision required to participate in league activity. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.